Massachusetts, session 194th, H1335.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 108 of chapter 156B of the General Laws as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence the following
sentence:- The state secretary shall not require fees for the revival of such corporation if it relates
to a person or beneficiary claiming an interest in property surrendered to the state treasurer
pursuant to section 10 of chapter 200A.
SECTION 2. Section 10 of chapter 200A of the General Laws as so appearing is hereby
amended by adding the following subsection:-
(j)(i) If a person or beneficiary claims an interest in property surrendered to the state
treasurer that is held by a terminated corporation, the state treasurer may certify that the
terminated corporation may be revived for the sole purpose of the person or beneficiary to collect
property held by the terminated corporation valued at $2,000 or less;
of 2

(ii) The state treasurer shall provide the person or beneficiary the certificate of revival of
the terminated corporation for the purpose of collecting property of $2,000 or less; and
(iii) The person or beneficiary shall submit the certificate of revival to the state secretary
and the state secretary shall waive the fee required in section 108 of chapter 156B for the revival
of a terminated corporation for property valued at $2,000 or less.
of 2